California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) (1) The fair hearing shall be held within 50 days of the date the appeal request form is received by the department or other agency designated by the department to receive appeal request forms, unless a continuance is granted to the claimant. A claimant’s first request for a continuance made prior to the commencement of the hearing shall be granted without a showing of good cause. A claimant may request additional continuances based on a showing of good cause. A claimant’s request for a continuance shall result in a waiver of the claimant’s Medicaid home and community-based services right to a decision within 90 days of the date the appeal request form is received.

(2) The regional center or state-operated facility also
 may request a continuance based upon a showing of good cause, provided that the granting of the continuance does not extend the time period for rendering a final administrative decision beyond the 90-day period provided for in this chapter. For purposes of this section, good cause for either party includes, but is not limited to, the following circumstances:

(A) Death of a spouse, parent, child, brother, sister, or grandparent of the claimant or authorized representative, or of the regional center or state-operated facility representative.

(B) Personal illness or injury of the claimant or authorized representative, or of the regional center or state-operated facility representative.

(C) Sudden and unexpected emergencies, including, but not limited to, court appearances or conflicting schedules if the conflict is
 beyond the control of the claimant, authorized representative, or regional center or state-operated facility representative.

(D) Unavailability of a witness or evidence, the absence of which would result in serious prejudice to the claimant or the regional center or state-operated facility.

(E) An intervening request for mediation by the claimant or the claimant’s authorized representative.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 19130, 19131, and 19132 of the Government Code, the department shall contract for the provision of independent hearing officers. Hearing officers shall have had at least two years of full-time legal training at a California or American Bar Association accredited law school or the equivalent in training and experience as established by regulations adopted by the department.

(2) Hearing officers shall receive training and information in the law and regulations governing services to people with intellectual and developmental disabilities and administrative hearings. Training shall include, but not be limited to, the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act and regulations adopted thereunder, relevant written directives and guidance issued by the department, relevant case law, information about services and supports available to persons with developmental disabilities, including innovative services and supports, the standard agreement contract between the department and regional centers, and regional center purchase-of-service policies. The training shall include methods to create an impartial and informal hearing environment that encourages the free and open exchange of information and engages the parties to bring out relevant facts, protecting the rights of claimants at fair hearings, with emphasis on
 assisting, if appropriate, an unrepresented claimant, family member, authorized representative, or advocate inexperienced in administrative hearings in fully developing the administrative record. The training also shall include information about disabilities and disability-related supports that may enable participation in a hearing, and reasonable accommodations to reduce barriers.

(3) The department and the hearing office shall seek the advice of stakeholders, including recipients and family members representing diverse disabilities and backgrounds, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the protection and advocacy agency identified in Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900) and designated by the Governor in this state to fulfill the requirements and assurances of the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, contained in Chapter 144 (commencing with Section 15001) of Title 42 of the United
 States Code, the Association of Regional Center Agencies, advocacy organizations, and other state agencies or organizations in the development of standardized hearing procedures for hearing officers and training materials and the implementation of training procedures by the department. The department shall provide formal training for hearing officers on at least an annual basis.

(c) The hearing officer shall not be an employee, agent, board member, or contractor of the regional center or state-operated facility against whose action the appeal has been filed, or a spouse, parent, child, brother, sister, grandparent, legal guardian, or conservator of the claimant, or any person who has a direct financial interest in the outcome of the fair hearing, or any other interest that would preclude a fair and impartial hearing.

(d) (1) The regional center or
 state-operated facility shall prepare a position statement and send it electronically to the hearing office and the claimant, unless the claimant has communicated an alternative way to receive the document, at least two business days prior to the hearing. The position statement shall summarize the facts of the case and set forth the justification of the regional center’s or state-operated facility’s action and shall include a list of witnesses that it intends to call during the hearing, the general subject of the testimony of each witness, and copies of all documentary evidence that it intends to use.

(A) If the preferred language of the claimant or their authorized representative is not English, the regional center also shall provide a copy of the position statement in their preferred language.

(B) If the regional center or state-operated facility cannot provide a copy of the
 position statement in the preferred language of the claimant or their authorized representative two business days prior to the hearing, the regional center or state-operated facility shall notify the claimant or their authorized representative, provide a copy of the position statement in English, and apply for a continuance of the hearing accompanied by evidence of its efforts to translate the position statement.

(C) The hearing officer shall, unless the claimant or their authorized representative indicates they want to proceed to hearing, continue the hearing for no more than 10 days following a determination that the regional center or state-operated facility has provided satisfactory evidence of its efforts to translate the position statement. The translated position statement shall be provided at least two business days prior to the continued hearing.

(2) At least two business
 days prior to the hearing, a claimant who is not represented by an attorney licensed to practice law in California shall make available to the regional center or state-operated facility and the hearing office a list of intended witnesses and a brief description of their relationship to the claimant and copies of any professional assessments or reports related to eligibility or services that the claimant intends to use at hearing. At or before the hearing, the claimant also shall make available to the regional center or state-operated facility and the hearing office copies of all other intended documentary evidence.

(3) If the claimant is represented by, or is, an attorney licensed to practice law in California, the claimant’s attorney shall prepare a position statement and make it available to the regional center or state-operated facility and the hearing office at least two business days prior to the hearing. The position statement shall
 summarize the facts of the case and set forth the justification for the claimant’s position and shall include a list of intended witnesses, the general subject of the testimony of each witness, and copies of all documentary evidence intended to be used.

(4) (A) The hearing officer may prohibit testimony of a witness or the introduction of documents that have not been disclosed. However, the hearing officer may allow introduction of documents or witness testimony in the interest of justice.

(B) In considering an unrepresented claimant’s failure to disclose testimony or documents, the hearing officer also may consider the claimant’s understanding of the disclosure requirements, disability factors that made it difficult for the claimant to comply with the rule, and the impact of excluding testimony or documents on the hearing officer’s ability to assist the
 parties in bringing out relevant facts.

(e) (1) The fair hearing shall be held at a time and place reasonably convenient to the claimant and the authorized representative. The claimant or the authorized representative of the claimant and the regional center shall agree on the place of the fair hearing.

(2) A place pursuant to paragraph (1) may include an agreement of the parties, or an order by a hearing officer, following a finding of good cause, to conduct the hearing by telephone, videoconference, or other electronic means.

(f) Merits of a pending fair hearing shall not be discussed between the hearing officer and a party outside the presence of the other party.

(g) The hearing officer shall voluntarily disqualify themselves and
 withdraw from any case in which the hearing officer cannot accord a fair and impartial hearing or consideration. Any party may request the disqualification of the hearing officer by filing an affidavit or making an objection on the record, prior to the taking of evidence at a hearing, stating with particularity the grounds upon which it is claimed that a fair and impartial hearing cannot be accorded. The issue shall be decided by the hearing officer and may be reviewed as part of the reconsideration process specified in Section 4713.

(h) Both parties to the fair hearing shall have the rights specified in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 4701.

(i) (1) The fair hearing shall be conducted in an impartial and informal manner in order to encourage the presentation of information and the free and open discussion by
 participants. The hearing officer shall make their best effort to fully and fairly develop the record and create an environment in which all relevant facts, both favorable and unfavorable, are brought out and to engage the parties to bring out the facts.

(2) The fair hearing need not be conducted according to the technical rules of evidence and those related to witnesses. Any relevant evidence shall be admitted. Both parties shall be allowed to submit documents into evidence at the beginning of the hearing. A party shall not be required to formally authenticate any document unless the hearing officer determines the necessity to do so in the interest of justice. All testimony shall be under oath or affirmation which the hearing officer is empowered to administer.

(3) The hearing officer may do any of the following during the hearing to assist in bringing out all relevant facts:

(A) Question a witness on the record.

(B) Call a witness to testify at the hearing.

(C) Hold the record open to allow a party to obtain necessary testimony or documentation identified by the hearing officer during the course of the fair hearing.

(j) A regional center or state-operated facility shall present its witnesses and all other evidence before the claimant presents the claimant’s case unless the parties agree otherwise or the hearing officer determines that it is appropriate for a witness to be heard out of order. This section does not alter the burden of proof.

(k) A recording shall be made of the proceedings before the hearing officer. Any cost of recording shall be borne by the
 hearing office.

(l) The fair hearing shall be conducted in the English language. However, if the preferred language of the claimant or authorized representative is not English, an interpreter shall be provided by the hearing office.

(m) The fair hearing shall be open to the public except at the request of the claimant or authorized representative or when personnel matters are being reviewed.

(n) The hearing office awarded the contract for independent hearing officers shall biennially conduct, or cause to be conducted, an evaluation of the hearing officers who conduct hearings under this part. The department shall approve the methodology used to conduct the evaluation. Information and data for this evaluation shall be solicited from recipients or applicants who participated in a fair hearing over the past two
 years, their family members or authorized representative if involved in the hearing, regional centers, and nonattorney advocates, attorneys who represented either party in a fair hearing over the past two years, and the organizations identified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). Regional centers shall forward copies of fair hearing decisions reviewed by the superior court to the department. The areas of evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, the hearing officers’ demeanor toward parties and witnesses, conduct of the hearing in accord with fairness and standards of due process, ability to fairly develop the record in cases in which applicants or recipients represent themselves or are represented by an advocate that does not have significant experience in fair hearings, use of legal authority, clarity of written decisions, and adherence to the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 4712.5. The department shall be provided with a copy of the evaluation and shall use the evaluation in partial
 fulfillment of its evaluation of the contract for the provision of independent hearing officers. A summary of the data collected shall be made available to the public upon request, provided that the names of individual hearing officers and the names and other identifiable information about applicants and recipients shall not be disclosed.

(o) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 56) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 57.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4712.2.

(a) Two or more claimants with a common complaint, or their authorized representatives, or a regional center or state-operated facility may request the consolidation of appeals involving a common question of law or fact. The hearing officer may grant the request for consolidation if the hearing officer finds that consolidation would not result in prejudice or undue inconvenience to any party, undue delay, or a violation of any claimant’s right to confidentiality unless the claimant agrees to have otherwise confidential information revealed to other claimants. Requests for consolidation shall be forwarded to the hearing officer and postmarked within five days of the receipt of the notice sent pursuant to Section 4711. The hearing officer shall notify the parties and authorized representatives, if any, of a
 request for consolidation and shall afford an opportunity for any written objections to be submitted.

(b) In all consolidated hearings, each individual claimant shall have all the rights specified in Section 4701. A separate written decision shall be issued to each claimant and respective authorized representatives.

(c) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 58) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 59.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4712.5.

(a) (1) Within 10 business days of the concluding day of the fair hearing, but not later than 80 days following the date the appeal request form was received by the department or by another agency designated by the department to receive the appeal request form, the hearing officer shall render any final written decision delegated by subdivisions (d) and (e) and shall transmit the decision to each party, to the director of the hearing office, and the department, along with notification that this is the final administrative decision, that each party shall be bound thereby, and that either party may request a reconsideration pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4713 within 15 days of receiving the decision or appeal the decision to a court of competent jurisdiction within 180 days of
 receiving the final decision.

(2) Within 10 days of the concluding day of the fair hearing, but not later than 60 days following the date the appeal request form was received by the department or by another agency designated by the department to receive the appeal request form, the hearing officer shall render any proposed written decision as allowed by subdivisions (d) and (e) and shall electronically transmit the decision to the applicable departments identified in subdivisions (d) and (e).

(b) A continuance granted to a claimant shall constitute a waiver of their Medicaid home- and community-based services right to a decision within 90 days of the date the appeal request form is received by the department or by another agency designated by the department to receive the appeal request form. The extension of time for the final decision resulting from the continuance shall be only
 as long as the time period of the continuance.

(c) (1) The hearing officer’s decision shall be in ordinary and concise language and shall contain a summary of the facts, a statement of the evidence from the proceedings that was relied upon, a decision on each of the issues presented, and an identification of the statutes, regulations, and policies supporting the decision.

(2) If the claimant’s or their authorized representative’s preferred language is not English, the hearing office shall provide the proposed or final written decision in English and in their preferred language.

(d) (1) In addition to any other delegation of authority granted to the Director of Health Care Services, the director may delegate their authority to adopt final decisions under this chapter to the
 hearing officers described in subdivision (b) of Section 4712 to the extent deemed appropriate by the director. Any delegation shall be stated in writing.

(2) If the decision involves an issue arising from the federal Medicaid home- and community-based services waiver program, the hearing officer’s decision shall be a proposed decision submitted to the Director of Health Care Services as the single state agency for the Medicaid program. Within 90 days following the date the appeal request form is received, the director may adopt the decision as written or decide the matter on the record. If the Director of Health Care Services does not act on the proposed decision within 90 days, the decision shall be deemed to be adopted by the Director of Health Care Services. The final decision shall be immediately transmitted to each party, along with the notice described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). If the decision of the Director of Health Care
 Services differs from the proposed decision of the hearing officer, a copy of that proposed decision shall also be served upon each party.

(3) If the claimant’s or their authorized representative’s preferred language is not English, the final administrative hearing decision of the director and the proposed decision of the hearing officer shall be provided to that person in English and in their preferred language.

(e) (1) The Director of Developmental Services shall have the authority to review a hearing officer’s proposed decision or to delegate their authority to adopt final decisions to the hearing officers described in subdivision (b) of Section 4712. The authority for hearing officers to adopt final decisions may be made within specified issues or types of cases to the extent deemed appropriate by the director. Any delegation shall be stated in
 writing.

(2) Within 30 days following receipt of the proposed decision, the Director of Developmental Services may adopt the proposed decision as written or decide the matter on the record, including the recording, with or without taking additional evidence. If the director does not act on the proposed decision within the 30 days, the proposed decision shall be deemed to be adopted by the director. The State Department of Developmental Services shall promptly transmit a final decision to each party, along with the notice described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). If the final decision of the director differs from the proposed decision of the hearing officer, a copy of the proposed decision also shall be served upon each party.

(3) If the claimant’s or their authorized representative’s preferred language is not English, the final hearing decision of the director and the
 proposed decision of the hearing officer shall be provided to that person in English and in their preferred language.

(f) The hearing office shall collect and maintain, or cause to be collected and maintained, redacted copies, that do not include any identifiable information concerning the claimant, of all final administrative hearing decisions issued under this chapter. Hearing decisions shall be searchable by the type of service or support that was the subject of the hearing, by the month and year of issuance, and any other categories identified by the State Department of Developmental Services. The hearing office shall make available to the public on the hearing office’s internet website searchable and downloadable redacted copies of all final administrative hearing decisions. These decisions shall be available no later than 30 days after the date of the final hearing decision. The State Department of Developmental Services shall use this
 information in partial fulfillment of its obligation to monitor regional centers and in its evaluation of the contract for the provision of independent hearing officers.

(g) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 60) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 61.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4713.

(a) If the final decision is unfavorable to the claimant, and the claimant has been receiving the services that have been the subject of the appeal, the decision shall not be implemented until 15 days after receipt of the final hearing decision by the claimant and the authorized representative, unless a reconsideration is requested within 15 days from the date of the final hearing decision. If a reconsideration is requested, any services shall continue as specified in Section 4715.

(b) Within 15 days of the date of the final hearing decision, a party may apply to the hearing office or to the director responsible for issuing the final decision for a correction of a mistake of fact or law, or a clerical error in the decision or in the decision of
 the hearing officer not to recuse themselves following a request pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 4712. The party shall state the specific grounds on which the application is made. Notice of the application shall be given to the other parties to the proceeding and to the department. The application is not a prerequisite for seeking judicial review. The other party may file a written statement supporting or opposing the application.

(c) The hearing office shall refer the application to a hearing officer who did not write the decision for which reconsideration is requested.

(d) Within 15 days of receiving the request, the hearing office or the director responsible for issuing the decision may deny the application, grant the application and modify the decision, or grant the application and set the matter for further proceedings. If further proceedings are authorized, they shall
 be conducted in the same manner and subject to the same time limits as the original hearing. Within one day of its decision on the application, the hearing office shall notify the parties and the department of its decision on the application.

(e) The hearing office or the director responsible for issuing the decision shall, within five business days after correction of a mistake of fact or law or clerical error in the decision, serve a copy of the corrected decision on each party and provide a copy to the State Department of Developmental Services.

(f) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 63) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 64.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4713.5.

(a) The regional center shall implement the final hearing decision as soon as practical and not later than 30 days following the date of the final hearing decision, or, if a reconsideration was granted, the regional center shall implement the final corrected decision 30 days following the reconsideration, unless the regional center notifies the claimant and their authorized representative in writing, with a copy to the department, of the specific exceptional circumstances that make it impossible to implement the decision within that timeframe and provides the date when the decision will be implemented.

(b) The claimant or authorized representative may contact the department if they are dissatisfied with the regional center’s or the
 state-operated facility’s compliance with the decision. Upon notification, the department shall take appropriate actions to obtain compliance with the decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 65.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4714.

(a) For each appeal request form submitted pursuant to Section 4710.5, the department shall collect information related to the appeal from regional centers or state-operated facilities in a manner and at times determined by the department. The information collected shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Whether the case was resolved before an informal meeting or through an informal meeting.

(2) Whether the case was withdrawn and the reason for the withdrawal.

(3) Whether an informal meeting was declined.

(4) The issue or issues
 involved in the case by issue type, as specified by the department.

(5) If the case was resolved, the resolution outcome.

(6) Demographic information, as identified by the department, about the claimants.

(7) A copy of the written decision of the regional center director or designee or state-operated facility director or designee.

(b) For each appeal request submitted to the hearing office to conduct a mediation or a fair hearing, the department shall collect information relating to the request from the hearing office. The information provided shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Whether the request was resolved before mediation, through mediation, through a fair
 hearing, through a reconsideration, or through a different means.

(2) Whether the request was withdrawn and the reason for the withdrawal.

(3) The issue or issues involved in the request by issue type, as specified by the department.

(4) If the request was resolved, the outcome.

(5) A copy of the written mediation agreement, the final administrative hearing decision, and the final reconsideration decision, as applicable.

(6) The average length of time between filing and resolution of the request.

(7) Demographic information, as identified by the department, about claimants.

(c) The information collected pursuant to this section shall be compiled by the department. The department shall post aggregate information on its internet website at least annually and shall notify the Legislature when the information has been posted. The names of recipients and applicants and other personally identifiable information shall not be disclosed.

(d) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 66) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 67.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Services Pending Final Administrative Decision [4715. - 4717.]

4715.

(a) Except as provided in this section, if an appeal request is postmarked or received by the department or by another agency designated by the department to receive the appeal request, no later than 30 days after receipt of the notice of the proposed action sent pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4710, but no later than the effective date of the action, services that are being provided pursuant to a recipient’s individual program plan shall be continued during the appeals process up to and including the 10th day after receipt of any of the following:

(1) Receipt by the regional center or state-operated facility, following an informal meeting, of the withdrawal of the appeal request pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4710.9, or the
 claimant’s receipt of the informal meeting decision if the claimant has not made a decision to withdraw the appeal request or proceed to hearing within three days of receipt of the informal meeting decision pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4710.9.

(2) Receipt by the regional center or state-operated facility, following mediation, of the withdrawal of the appeal request pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4711.7 or the date the hearing office takes the appeal off the calendar if the claimant has not decided to withdraw the appeal request or proceed to the fair hearing pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4711.7.

(3) Receipt by the recipient of the final administrative hearing decision of the hearing officer or state agency pursuant to subdivision (a), (d), or (e) of Section 4712.5.

(4) Receipt by the
 recipient of the final decision of the hearing officer following a rehearing pursuant to Section 4713 if a rehearing was requested within 15 days from the date of the final administrative hearing decision pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4713.

(b) Services continued pursuant to subdivision (a) may be modified by agreement of the parties in accordance with the decision of the interdisciplinary team and the individual program plan.

(c) Any appeal to a court by either party shall not operate as a stay of enforcement of the final administrative decision, provided that either party may seek a stay of enforcement from any court of competent jurisdiction.

(d) This section shall become operative on March 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 68) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 69.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative March 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4716.

Nothing in this chapter shall presume the incompetence of any person with a developmental disability to participate in any of the appeals procedures established herein.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 506, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4717.

The hearing office, in collaboration with the department, shall establish and maintain an advisory committee composed of stakeholders including recipients and family members, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the protection and advocacy agency identified in Section 4900 et. seq and designated by the Governor to fulfill the requirements and assurances of the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, contained in Chapter 144 (commencing with Section 15001) of Title 42 of the United States Code, representatives of regional centers, advocacy organizations, and the Association of Regional Center Agencies. The advisory committee shall meet at least semiannually and assist the hearing office by providing nonbinding recommendations for improvements to fair hearing and mediation
 operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 70.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Access to Records [4725. - 4731.]

4725.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) “Access” means the right to inspect, review, and obtain an accurate copy of any record obtained in the course of providing services under this division. A regional center or state-operated facility may make a reasonable charge in an amount not to exceed the actual cost of reproducing the record, unless the imposition of the cost would prohibit the exercise of the right to obtain a copy. A charge shall not be made to search for or retrieve any record.

(b) “Record” means any item of information directly relating to a person with developmental disabilities or to one who is believed to have a developmental disability that is maintained by a regional
 center or state-operated facility, whether recorded by handwriting, print, tapes, film, microfilm, or other means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 71.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4726.

Notwithstanding any other law, access to records regarding an applicant for, or recipient of, services shall be provided, upon request, to the applicant, recipient, or their authorized representative, including the person appointed as a developmental services decisionmaker pursuant to Section 319, 361, or 726, for any purpose, including, but not limited to, the appeal process under this chapter, unless disclosure of the record is expressly prohibited by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 902, Sec. 6.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4727.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to compel a physician, psychologist, social worker, nurse, attorney, or other professional person to reveal information which has been given to him or her in confidence by members of a recipient’s or applicant’s family.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 506, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4728.

Each regional center and the department for its state-operated facilities shall adopt procedures for granting of requests by persons authorized under Section 4726 for access to records during regular business hours, provided that access shall be granted no later than three business days following the date of receipt of the oral or written request for access. Procedures shall include notice of the location of all records and the provision of qualified personnel to interpret records if requested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 73.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4729.

Whenever access to regional center or state-operated facility records is requested, the regional center or state-operated facility shall provide at least the following information:

(a) The types of records maintained by the service agency.

(b) The position of the official responsible for the maintenance of records.

(c) The right of access to the records, and the policies of the regional center or state-operated facility for obtaining access, including the cost, if any, consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 4725, to be charged for reproducing copies of records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 74.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4730.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 506, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4731.

(a) Each consumer or any representative acting on behalf of any consumer or consumers, who believes that any right to which a consumer is entitled has been abused, punitively withheld, or improperly or unreasonably denied by a regional center, state-operated facility, or service provider, may pursue a complaint as provided in this section.

(b) Initial referral of any complaint taken pursuant to this section shall be to the director of the regional center from which the consumer receives case management services. If the consumer resides in a state-operated facility, the complaint shall be made to the director of the state-operated facility. The director shall, within 20 working days of receiving a complaint, investigate the complaint and send a written proposed
 resolution to the complainant and, if applicable, to the service provider. The written proposed resolution shall include a telephone number and mailing address for referring the proposed resolution in accordance with subdivision (c).

(c) If the complainant is not satisfied with the proposed resolution, the complainant may refer the complaint, in writing, to the Director of Developmental Services within 15 working days of receipt of the proposed resolution. The director shall, within 45 days of receiving a complaint, issue a written administrative decision and send a copy of the decision to the complainant, the director of the regional center or state-operated facility, and the service provider, if applicable. If there is no referral to the department, the proposed resolution shall become effective on the 20th working day following receipt by the complainant.

(d) The department
 shall annually compile the number of complaints filed, by each regional center and state-operated facility, the subject matter of each complaint, and a summary of each decision. Copies shall be made available to any person upon request.

(e) This section shall not be used to resolve disputes concerning the nature, scope, or amount of services and supports that should be included in an individual program plan, for which there is an appeals procedure established in this division, or disputes regarding rates or audit appeals for which there is an appeals procedure established in regulations. Those disputes shall be resolved through the appeals procedure established by this division or in regulations.

(f) All consumers or, if appropriate, their authorized representative, shall be notified in writing in their preferred language of the right to file a complaint pursuant to this section
 when they apply for services from a regional center or a state-operated facility, and at each regularly scheduled planning meeting.

(g) Any complaint filed prior to February 1, 2027, shall continue to be addressed pursuant to the provisions of this section as it read immediately preceding its repeal by the act that added this subdivision.

(h) This section shall become inoperative on February 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 42.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Inoperative February 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Residential Care Facility Appeals Procedures [4740. - 4748.]

4740.

The Legislature finds the following:

(a) The quality of care provided to persons with developmental disabilities by residential facilities is contingent upon a closely coordinated “team” effort by the regional center or its designee, the person with developmental disabilities, the parent or representative if appropriate, the residential facility administrator, and the licensing agency. The rights and responsibilities of each must be identified in order to assure clear direction and accountability for each.

(b) The quality of care is impaired when inordinate numbers of staff from placement and licensing agencies give direction to the facility administrator regarding care and service requirements.
